en: Cable shielding: Braided (STP); Foil & braided (SFTP); Foil (FTP); Overall foil (S/FTP); Unshielded (UTP); Other
zh-CN: 电缆屏蔽: 编织 (STP); 箔片和编织 (SFTP); 箔片 (FTP); 整体箔片 (S/FTP); 无屏蔽 (UTP); 其他
sk-SK: Ochrana káblov: Pletený (STP); Fóliový a pletený (SFTP); Fólia (FTP); Celková fólia (S/FTP); Netienený (UTP); Iné
nb: Kabelskjerming: Flettet (STP); Folie og flettet (SFTP); Folie (FTP); Total folie (S/FTP); Uskjermet (UTP); Annet
da: Kabelafskærmning: Flettet (STP); Folie og flettet (SFTP); Folie (FTP); Heldækkende folie (S/FTP); Uafskærmet (UTP); Andet
ro-RO: Ecranare cablu: Împletit (STP); Folie și împletitură (SFTP); Folie (FTP); Ecranare generală cu folie (S/FTP); Neecranat (UTP); Altele
hr-HR: Oklop kabela: Pleteni (STP); Folija i pletenica (SFTP); Folija (FTP); Zaštitna folija (S/FTP); Nezaštićeni (UTP); Ostalo
fr: Revêtement du câble: Tressé (STP); Feuille & tressé (SFTP); Feuille (FTP); Feuille globale (S/FTP); Non blindé (UTP); Autre
pl: Ekranowanie kabla: Plecionka (STP); Folia i plecionka (SFTP); Folia (FTP); Folia całościowa (S/FTP); Nieekranowany (UTP); Inne
zh-TW: 電纜屏蔽層: 編織; 雙隔離結構; 箔 (FTP); 整體鋁箔 (S/FTP); 非屏蔽 (UTP); 其他
ja: ケーブルシールド: 編み込み (STP); フォイル&ブレード (SFTP); フォイル (FTP); オーバーオールフォイル (S/FTP); シールドなし (UTP); その他
it: Schermatura del cavo: Intrecciato (STP); Lamina e intrecciato (SFTP); Lamina (FTP); Lamina complessiva (S/FTP); Non schermato (UTP); Altro
hu: Kábel árnyékolása: Sodrott (STP); Fóliázott-sodrott (SFTP); Fóliázott (FTP); Teljesen fóliázott (S/FTP); Árnyékolatlan (UTP); Egyéb
es: Blindaje de los cables: Trenzado (STP); Lámina y trenzado (SFTP); Lámina (FTP); Lámina general (S/FTP); Sin apantallar (UTP); Otros
th: การป้องกันสายเคเบิล: ถัก (STP); ฟอยล์และถัก (SFTP); ฟอยล์ (FTP); ฟอยล์ทั้งหมด (S/FTP); ไม่หุ้มฉนวน (UTP); อื่นๆ
vi: Vỏ chống nhiễu dây cáp: Bện (STP); Giấy bạc & bện (SFTP); Giấy bạc (FTP); Giấy bạc tổng thể (S/FTP); Không được che chắn (UTP); Khác
cs: Izolace kabelu: Splétané (STP); Fólie a splétané (SFTP); Fólie (FTP); Celoplošná fólie (S/FTP); Nestíněné (UTP); Jiné
de: Kabelschirmung: Geflochten (STP); Folie & Geflecht (SFTP); Folie (FTP); Rundumfolie (S/FTP); Ungeschirmt (UTP); Sonstiges
sv: Kabelskärmning: Flätad (STP); Folie & flätad (SFTP); Folie (FTP); Övergripande folie (S/FTP); Oskärmad (UTP); Övrigt
sl-SI: Zaščita kabla: Pleten (STP); Folija in pletenica (SFTP); Folija (FTP); Celotna folija (S/FTP); Neoklopljen (UTP); Drugo
ko: 케이블 차폐: 편조(STP); 호일 & 편조(SFTP); 호일(FTP); 전체 호일(S/FTP); 비차폐(UTP); 기타
ru: Экранирование кабеля: Оплетка (STP); Фольга и оплетка (SFTP); Фольга (FTP); Полностью фольга (S/FTP); Неэкранированный (UTP); Другое
pt-BR: Blindagem do cabo: Trançado (STP); Revestido e trançado (SFTP); Revestido (FTP); Revestido geral (S/FTP); Não blindado (UTP); Outro
fi: Kaapelin suojaus: STP-kaapeli; SFTP-kaapeli; FTP-kaapeli; S/FTP-kaapeli; UTP-kaapeli; Muu
lt-LT: Kabelio ekranavimas: Pinta (STP); Dengta folija ir pinta (SFTP); Folija (FTP); Dengti folija (S/FTP); Neekranuotas (UTP); Kita
nl: Kabelafscherming: Gevlochten (STP); Folie & gevlochten (SFTP); Folie (FTP); Totaal folie (S/FTP); Niet afgeschermd (UTP); Andere
tr: Kablo Koruması: Örgülü (STP); Folyo ve örgülü (SFTP); Folyo (FTP); Genel folyo (S/FTP); Korumasız (UTP); Diğer
el: Θωράκιση καλωδίου: Πλέγματα (STP); Φύλλο μετάλλου και πλέγματα (SFTP); Φύλλο μετάλλου (FTP); Επιπλέον φύλλο μετάλλου πάνω από τα πλέγματα (S/FTP); Χωρίς θωράκιση (UTP); Άλλο
bg-BG: Екраниране на кабел: Оплетка (STP); Фолио и оплетка (SFTP); Фолио (FTP); Общо фолио (S/FTP); Неекраниран (UTP); Други
pt-PT: Proteção do cabo: Trançado; Alumínio e trançado (SFTP); Alumínio (FTP); Alumínio geral (S/FTP); Não blindado (UTP); Outro